tests/ky-nouns.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../tr-ky.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ky-tr.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] Мягкий знак deletion before suffix":
    июль<n><dat> : июлга

  "[twol] L desonorisation":
    адам<n><pl><nom> : адамдар
    адам<n><pl><nom>+э<cop><p3><sg> : адамдар
    адам<n><pl><nom>+э<cop><p3><pl> : адамдар

  "[twol] Double vowel harmony in suffix":
    дүйнө<n><rloc><nom> : дүйнөдөгү
    дүйнө<n><rloc><nom>+э<cop><p3><sg> : дүйнөдөгү
    дүйнө<n><rloc><nom>+э<cop><p3><pl> : дүйнөдөгү

  "[lexc] 1st person singular possessive":
    ат<n><px1sg><nom> : атым
    ат<n><px1sg><nom>+э<cop><p3><sg> : атым
    ат<n><px1sg><nom>+э<cop><p3><pl> : атым
    салт<n><px1sg><nom> : салтым
    салт<n><px1sg><nom>+э<cop><p3><sg> : салтым
    салт<n><px1sg><nom>+э<cop><p3><pl> : салтым

  "[lexc] 1st person plural noun singular possessive":
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><nom> : аттарым
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><nom>+э<cop><p3><sg> : аттарым
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><nom>+э<cop><p3><pl> : аттарым
    салт<n><pl><px1sg><nom> : салттарым
    салт<n><pl><px1sg><nom>+э<cop><p3><sg> : салттарым
    салт<n><pl><px1sg><nom>+э<cop><p3><pl> : салттарым

  "[lexc] 1st person plural possessive":
    ат<n><px1pl><nom> : атыбыз
    салт<n><px1pl><nom> : салтыбыз
  
  "[lexc] 1st person plural noun plural possessive":
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : аттарыбыз
    салт<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : салттарыбыз

  "[lexc] 2nd person singular possessive":
    ат<n><px2sg><nom> : атың
    салт<n><px2sg><nom> : салтың
    ат<n><px2sg><frm><nom> : атыңыз
    салт<n><px2sg><frm><nom> : салтыңыз

  "[lexc] 2nd person plural noun singular possessive":
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><nom> : аттарың
    салт<n><pl><px2sg><nom> : салттарың
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><frm><nom> : аттарыңыз
    салт<n><pl><px2sg><frm><nom> : салттарыңыз

  "[lexc] 2nd person plural possessive":
    ат<n><px2pl><nom> : атыңар
    салт<n><px2pl><nom> : салтыңар
    ат<n><px2pl><frm><nom> : атыңыздар
    салт<n><px2pl><frm><nom> : салтыңыздар

  "[lexc] 2nd person plural noun plural possessive":
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><nom> : аттарыңар
    салт<n><pl><px2pl><nom> : салттарыңар
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><frm><nom> : аттарыңыздар
    салт<n><pl><px2pl><frm><nom> : салттарыңыздар

  "[lexc] 3rd person singular noun possessive":
    ат<n><px3sg><nom> : аты
    салт<n><px3sg><nom> : салты
    китеп<n><px3sg><nom> : китеби
    тарап<n><px3sg><nom> : тарабы
    ат<n><px3pl><nom> : аты
    салт<n><px3pl><nom> : салты
    китеп<n><px3pl><nom> : китеби
    тарап<n><px3pl><nom> : тарабы

  "[lexc] 3rd person noun possessive plural":
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><nom> : аттары
    салт<n><pl><px3pl><nom> : салттары
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><nom> : аттары
    салт<n><pl><px3sg><nom> : салттары
  
  "[lexc] Miscellaneous possessives": 
    ат<n><px1sg><nom> : атым
    бала<n><px1sg><nom> : балам
    ат<n><px1pl><nom> : атыбыз
    бала<n><px1pl><nom> : балабыз
    ат<n><px2sg><nom> : атың
    бала<n><px2sg><nom> : балаң
    ат<n><px2sg><frm><nom> : атыңыз
    бала<n><px2sg><frm><nom> : балаңыз
    ат<n><px2pl><nom> : атыңар
    бала<n><px2pl><nom> : балаңар
    ат<n><px2pl><frm><nom> : атыңыздар
    бала<n><px2pl><frm><nom> : балаңыздар
    ат<n><px3sg><nom> : аты
    ат<n><px3pl><nom> : аты
    бала<n><px3sg><nom> : баласы
    бала<n><px3pl><nom> : баласы
    эл<n><px><nom> : элдики
    мал<n><px><nom> : малдыкы
    бала<n><px2sg><px><nom> : балаңдыкы
    тоо<n><px><nom> : тоонуку
    төө<n><px><nom> : төөнүкү
    
  "[lexc] Singular genitive (-{N}{I}n)": 
    кеме<n><gen> : кеменин
    кол<n><gen> : колдун
    көз<n><gen> : көздүн
    баш<n><gen> : баштын
    аба<n><gen> : абанын
    туз<n><gen> : туздун
    челек<n><gen> : челектин
    

  "[lexc] Singular dative (-{G}{A})": 
    кеме<n><dat> : кемеге
    аба<n><dat> : абага
    кол<n><dat> : колго
    көз<n><dat> : көзгө
    #баш<n><dat> : башка
    туз<n><dat> : тузга
    челек<n><dat> : челекке
    таш<n><dat> : ташка
    от<n><dat> : отко
    терек<n><dat> : терекке
    жүрөк<n><dat> : жүрөккө
    адам<n><dat> : адамга

  "[lexc] Singular accusative (-{N}{I})": 
    кеме<n><acc> : кемени
    ай<n><acc> : айды
    тор<n><acc> : торду
    кол<n><acc> : колду
    көз<n><acc> : көздү
    баш<n><acc> : башты
    таң<n><acc> : таңды
    туз<n><acc> : тузду
    челек<n><acc> : челекти
    парта<n><acc> : партаны
    кино<n><acc> : кинону
    терезе<n><acc> : терезени
    көчө<n><acc> : көчөнү
    кыз<n><acc> : кызды
    кулун<n><acc> : кулунду
    жер<n><acc> : жерди
    #жүзүм<n><acc> : жүзүмдү
    бакыт<n><acc> : бакытты
    куш<n><acc> : кушту
    китеп<n><acc> : китепти
    күрөк<n><acc> : күрөктү

  "[lexc] Singular locative (-{D}{A})": 
    кеме<n><loc> : кемеде
    аба<n><loc> : абада
    челек<n><loc> : челекте
    кол<n><loc> : колдо
    баш<n><loc> : башта
    туз<n><loc> : тузда
    көз<n><loc> : көздө

  "[lexc] Singular ablative (-{D}{A}n)": 
    кеме<n><abl> : кемеден
    аба<n><abl> : абадан
    челек<n><abl> : челектен
    кол<n><abl> : колдон
    баш<n><abl> : баштан
    туз<n><abl> : туздан
    көз<n><abl> : көздөн

  "[lexc] Plural suffix": 
    кеме<n><pl><nom> : кемелер
    ай<n><pl><nom> : айлар
    тор<n><pl><nom> : торлор
    кол<n><pl><nom> : колдор
    таң<n><pl><nom> : таңдар
    көз<n><pl><nom> : көздөр
    баш<n><pl><nom> : баштар

  "[lexc] Relativised locative":
    дүйнө<n><rloc><nom> : дүйнөдөгү

  "[twol] p desonorization into b when Vow p Vow":
    мектеп<n><px1sg><nom> : мектебим
    китеп<n><px1sg><nom> : китебим
    арип<n><px1sg><nom> : арибим
    арап<n><px1sg><nom> : арабым
    араб<n><px1sg><nom> : арабым
    азап<n><px1sg><nom> : азабым
    зайып<n><px1sg><nom> : зайыбым

  "[twol] {G} / г deletion after uyan consonant":
    саат<n><px1sg><dat> : саатыма
    үй<n><px1sg><dat> : үйүмө
    мектеп<n><px1sg><dat> : мектебиме
    короо<n><px1sg><dat> : короомо
    бала<n><px1sg><dat> : балама
    бала<n><px2sg><dat> : балаңа
    мектеп<n><px2sg><dat> : мектебиңе
    китеп<n><px1sg><dat> : китебиме
    китеп<n><px2sg><dat> : китебиңе
    эже<n><px1sg><dat> : эжеме
    эже<n><px2sg><dat> : эжеңе
    бала<n><dat> : балага
    китеп<n><dat> : китепке
    аскер<n><dat> : аскерге
    кыз<n><dat> : кызга
    алд<n><px3sg><dat> : алдына

  "[twol] {G} / г desonorisation into н after between {I} and {A}":
    апа<n><px1sg><px><dat> : апамдыкына
    апа<n><px2sg><px><dat> : апаңдыкына
    апа<n><px3sg><px><dat> : апасыныкына
    апа<n><px3pl><px><dat> : апасыныкына
    кыз<n><px1pl><px><dat> : кызыбыздыкына
    кыз<n><px2pl><px><dat> : кызыңардыкына
    кыз<n><pl><px3sg><px><dat> : кыздарыныкына
    кыз<n><pl><px3pl><px><dat> : кыздарыныкына
    ата<n><pl><px3sg><px><dat> : аталарыныкына
    ата<n><pl><px3pl><px><dat> : аталарыныкына
    саат<n><pl><px3sg><px><dat> : сааттарыныкына
    саат<n><pl><px3pl><px><dat> : сааттарыныкына
    мал<n><pl><px3sg><px><dat> : малдарыныкына
    мал<n><pl><px3pl><px><dat> : малдарыныкына

  "[twol] {D} -> н in ablative": 
    ата<n><px3sg><px><abl> : атасыныкынан
    ата<n><px3pl><px><abl> : атасыныкынан

  "[twol] н insertion between {I} and {D} in locative":
    ата<n><px3sg><px><loc> : атасыныкында
    ата<n><px3pl><px><loc> : атасыныкында

  "[twol] Voiceless non-coronal stop voicing before possessive >c{I}":
    китеп<n><px3sg><nom> : китеби
    китеп<n><px3pl><nom> : китеби
    тарап<n><px3sg><nom> : тарабы
    тарап<n><px3pl><nom> : тарабы
    эмгек<n><px3pl><nom> : эмгеги
    эмгек<n><px3sg><nom> : эмгеги

  "[freq] unrecognised nouns from top 150":
    жыйнак<n><px3sg><nom> : жыйнагы
    жыйнак<n><px3pl><nom> : жыйнагы
    повесть<n><nom> : повесть
    повесть<n><pl><nom> : повесттер
    союз<n><px3sg><gen> : союзунун
    тарап<n><px3sg><abl> : тарабынан
    тил<n><px3sg><loc> : тилинде
    университет<n><px3sg><gen> : университетинин
    бала<n><pl><nom> : балдар
    гезит<n><px3sg><loc> : гезитинде
    жылдык<n><nom> : жылдык
    гезит<n><px3sg><gen> : гезитинин
    район<n><px3sg><gen> : районунун
    эмгек<n><px3sg><nom> : эмгеги
    эл<n><px3sg><gen> : элинин
    китеп<n><px3sg><nom> : китеби
    тил<n><px3sg><dat> : тилине
    орунбасар<n><px3sg><nom> : орунбасары

  "[freq] unrecognised nouns from top 150":
    союз<n><px3sg><gen> : союзунун
    союз<n><px3pl><gen> : союзунун
    уч<n><px3sg><gen> : учунун
    уч<n><px3pl><gen> : учунун

  "[twol] possessive + cases":
    бала<n><px3sg><nom> : баласы
    бала<n><px3sg><acc> : баласын
    бала<n><px3sg><gen> : баласынын
    бала<n><px3sg><loc> : баласында
    бала<n><px3sg><abl> : баласынан
    бала<n><px3sg><dat> : баласына
    бала<n><px3sg><px><nom> : баласыныкы
    ит<n><px3sg><nom> : ити
    ит<n><px3sg><acc> : итин
    ит<n><px3sg><gen> : итинин
    ит<n><px3sg><loc> : итинде
    ит<n><px3sg><abl> : итинен
    ит<n><px3sg><dat> : итине
    ит<n><px3sg><px><nom> : итиники
    эже<n><px3sg><nom> : эжеси
    эже<n><px3sg><acc> : эжесин
    эже<n><px3sg><gen> : эжесинин
    эже<n><px3sg><loc> : эжесинде
    эже<n><px3sg><abl> : эжесинен
    эже<n><px3sg><dat> : эжесине
    эже<n><px3sg><px><nom> : эжесиники

  "[twol] cases":
    бала<n><nom> : бала
    бала<n><acc> : баланы
    бала<n><gen> : баланын
    бала<n><loc> : балада
    бала<n><abl> : баладан
    бала<n><dat> : балага
    бала<n><px><nom> : баланыкы
    ит<n><nom> : ит
    ит<n><acc> : итти
    ит<n><gen> : иттин
    ит<n><loc> : итте
    ит<n><abl> : иттен
    ит<n><dat> : итке
    ит<n><px><nom> : иттики
    ит<n><rloc><nom> : иттеги
    эже<n><nom> : эже
    эже<n><acc> : эжени
    эже<n><gen> : эженин
    эже<n><loc> : эжеде
    эже<n><abl> : эжеден
    эже<n><dat> : эжеге
    эже<n><px><nom> : эженики
    эже<n><rloc><nom> : эжедеги
    төл<n><nom> : төл
    төл<n><acc> : төлдү
    төл<n><gen> : төлдүн
    төл<n><loc> : төлдө
    төл<n><abl> : төлдөн
    төл<n><dat> : төлгө
    төл<n><px><nom> : төлдүкү
